Wyoming statutes. Title 41 Water
Article 5. Application for Permit for Appropriation; Procedure

Cross references. —

As to applicability of §§

41-4-501

through

41-4-510

and

41-4-517

to application for secondary permit to use reservoir waters, see §

41-3-302

.

As to procedure for adjudication with reference to board of control, see §§

41-4-301

through

41-4-328

.

Water rights not acquired by adverse possession. —

The district court correctly dismissed a complaint seeking a determination of ownership in water rights by virtue of adverse possession, for the simple reason that water rights may not be acquired by adverse possession or prescription in this state. Lewis v. State Bd. of Control, 699 P.2d 822,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 483

(Wyo. 1985).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Industrial Siting Legislation: The Wyoming Industrial Development Information and Siting Act — Advance or Retreat?” see XI Land & Water L. Rev. 27 (1976).

For case note, “Water Law — The State Engineer's Authority with Reference to Change of Use, Place of Use, Point of Diversion, and Means of Conveyance of Water Embraced by Water Permits. Green River Dev. Co. v. FMC Corp., 660 P.2d 339,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 288

(Wyo. 1983),” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 59 (1984).

For comment, “Forfeiture Proceedings in Wyoming Water Law: The Legislature Revives Private Standing,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 459 (1985).

For article, “A Critical Look at Wyoming Water Law,” see XXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 307 (1989).

For casenote, “Water Law — Drawing the Line on Indian Reserved Water Rights: No ‘Super-Walton’ Rights in Wyoming's Big Horn River System. In re The General Adjudication of All Rights to Use Water in the Big Horn River System and All Other Sources, State of Wyoming, 899 P.2d 848,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 118

(Wyo. 1995),” see XXXI Land & Water L. Rev. 425 (1996).

§ 41-4-501.
Permit required prior to construction of ditches, canals or other distributing works; contents of application; unlawful diversion or use of water prohibited; rulemaking authority.

Any person, association or corporation hereafter intending to acquire the right to the beneficial use of the public water of the state of Wyoming shall, before commencing the construction, enlargement or extension of any ditch, canal or other distributing works, or performing any work in connection with said construction, or proposed appropriation, make an application to the state engineer for a permit to make such appropriation. Such application shall set forth the name, email address, if any, and post-office address of the applicant, the source of the water supply, the nature of the proposed use, the location and description of the proposed ditch, canal or other work, the time within which it is proposed to begin construction, the time required for completion of construction and the time required for the complete application of the water to the proposed use. The application shall also state whether the applicant will opt for any notices issued under this article to be delivered only by electronic means. Each applicant shall maintain a current post-office address with the state engineer and shall maintain an email address with the state engineer if opting for notice only by electronic means under this subsection. Any person who shall willfully divert or use water to the detriment of others without compliance with law shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor punishable pursuant to W.S.

41-3-616

.

The state engineer may allow the application to be submitted electronically as provided by the Uniform Electronic Transactions Act, W.S.

40-21-101

through

40-21-119

.

The state engineer may adopt reasonable rules and regulations in accordance with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act as necessary to implement this section.

Any rules and regulations implementing this section or any predecessor to this section which were duly adopted according to the procedure for adoption at the time of adoption, which were effective as of July 1, 2008 and which have not been repealed or replaced as of July 1, 2008, are deemed to have been lawfully adopted in accordance with law and within the scope of the state engineer’s rulemaking authority.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 8, § 34; 1895, ch. 45, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 917; Laws 1907, ch. 86, § 13; C.S. 1910, § 727; C.S. 1920, § 835; R.S. 1931, § 122-404; C.S. 1945, § 71-238; W.S. 1957, § 41-201; Laws 2005, ch. 82, § 2; 2009, ch. 89, § 1; 2021 ch. 26, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, rewrote the last sentence, which formerly provided that on conviction of willful diversion or use of water to the detriment of others, a person could be fined up to $100 and/or imprisoned in the county jail for a term not exceeding six months, and that the possession or use of water, except when a right of use is acquired in accordance with law, was prima facie evidence of the guilt.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, added the (a) designation, and added (b) through (d).

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, in the second sentence of (a), substituted "shall" for "must" following application, added ", email address, if any," and added the third and fourth sentences.

State owns water and controls use. —

Where original appropriation, which remains unchanged, was made as of 1893, to irrigate certain lands, a later use on other lands outside of specified perimeter, through a diversion from the original ditch, such affords no right, however claimed, as water belongs to the state and only use of it is granted appropriator in the manner and method specifically permitted. Lincoln Land Co. v. Davis, 27 F. Supp. 1006, 1939 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 2789 (D. Wyo. 1939).

Only natural water can be appropriated. —

In view of art. 8, § 1, Wyo. Const., only waters of natural streams, springs or lakes are subject to appropriation. Binning v. Miller, 55 Wyo. 451, 102 P.2d 54,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1940).

A “watercourse” is a stream of water usually flowing in a particular direction, with well defined banks and channels, but the water need not flow continuously, and the channel may sometimes be dry. State v. Hiber, 48 Wyo. 172, 44 P.2d 1005,

1935 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 1935).

Evidence failed to sustain state's contention that a draw is a natural stream, where it is dry most of the time, and is covered with grass, has no banks and, so far as evidence shows, has no natural outlet. State v. Hiber, 48 Wyo. 172, 44 P.2d 1005,

1935 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 1935).

Private water cannot be appropriated. —

Seepage and waste water is private water so long as it is on the lands from which it originates and such water cannot be appropriated by adjoining landowners. Binning v. Miller, 55 Wyo. 451, 102 P.2d 54,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1940).

An attempted appropriation of waste and seepage waters, being private waters is void. Binning v. Miller, 55 Wyo. 451, 102 P.2d 54,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1940).

Private water can become natural stream. —

Where during course of 30 years seepage water flowing down a draw finally made a regular, natural stream with definite channels and banks, waters thereof are subject to appropriation. Binning v. Miller, 55 Wyo. 451, 102 P.2d 54,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1940).

No prescriptive rights to water. —

Since 1890 when water rights were required to be initiated by permit from state engineer, it is settled with us that prescriptive right to state waters cannot obtain. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

Appropriation as property right. —

Where appropriation was made as of April, 1887, and adjudicated by decree before statehood in 1889, for 7.2 cu. ft. of water to irrigate an unspecified 90 acres of land, which, used on certain lands for some years, was, since 1930, transferred by use in part to other lands of same ownership, through an extension of original ditch, such appropriation, applied to a beneficial use, is a “property right,” and cannot be abridged without infringing upon constitutional right of the owner. Hughes v. Lincoln Land Co., 27 F. Supp. 972, 1939 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 2772 (D. Wyo. 1939).

A water right may not be initiated under this section except pursuant to a permit

and the requirement of such permit is mandatory. Laramie Rivers Co. v. Levasseur, 65 Wyo. 414, 202 P.2d 680,

1949 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1949).

Appropriation permit and application therefor to state engineer was condition precedent to lawful appropriation, notwithstanding art. 8, Wyo. Const., does not require such permit. Wyoming Hereford Ranch v. Hammond Packing Co., 33 Wyo. 14, 236 P. 764,

1925 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 1925).

Where after a permit had been granted to defendant's assignors to construct a ditch, plaintiff filed an application, which was not approved and in an action by plaintiff to enjoin construction of defendant's ditch, plaintiff offered evidence to show a survey of his ditch and its partial construction the year before such evidence was not admissible to show priority of water right as no right could have been gained until a permit had been granted. Whalon v. North Platte Canal & Colonization Co., 11 Wyo. 313, 71 P. 995,

1903 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1903).

Water permit is authority to pursue water right. —

A conditional but unfulfilled promise on the part of the state to allow the permittee to one day apply the state's water in a particular place and to a specific beneficial use under conditions where the rights of other appropriators will not be impaired. When the petitioner has complied with certain statutory requirements, the state's promise is directed by statute to be fulfilled with the issuing of a certificate of appropriation, the date of priority to be the date upon which the application for the permit was filed. Green River Dev. Co. v. FMC Corp., 660 P.2d 339,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 288

(Wyo. 1983).

Permit for benefit of another. —

Statutory provision, that an application to state engineer for permit to make appropriation and acquire right to beneficial use of public waters, is not necessarily to be interpreted that application shall be for the benefit of applicant himself. Scherck v. Nichols, 55 Wyo. 4, 95 P.2d 74,

1939 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo. 1939).

The fact that defendant's lands belonged to government when appropriation was taken out will not preclude assertion of right to use of water, if the lands were included in the appropriation and water beneficially applied to them. Lincoln Land Co. v. Davis, 27 F. Supp. 1006, 1939 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 2789 (D. Wyo. 1939).

Permit application not necessarily for applicant's benefit. —

An application for a permit to appropriate water for irrigation pursuant to this section does not necessarily have to be for the benefit of the applicant. White v. Board of Land Comm'rs, 595 P.2d 76,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 415

(Wyo. 1979).

Beneficial use. —

Beneficial use in the ultimate foundation of every water right under the priority of appropriation system prevailing in arid states. Lincoln Land Co. v. Davis, 27 F. Supp. 1006, 1939 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 2789 (D. Wyo. 1939).

Initial filing sets priority. —

Where plaintiff's original application for permission for a reservoir was returned by the engineer for additional information, and a second application with such information was subsequently filed, the two applications were taken as one and applicant given all the benefit of his priority under the first filing. Laughlin v. State Bd. of Control, 21 Wyo. 99, 128 P. 517,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1912).

Ex parte proceedings. —

Holder of certificate of appropriation could not, in ex parte proceeding before state board of control, obtain an adjudication clarifying the certificate by excluding from right to use water lands of others included in the description contained in the certificate. Lincoln Land Co. v. Davis, 27 F. Supp. 1006, 1939 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 2789 (D. Wyo. 1939).

Showing of interest necessary to attack another's right. —

Before party may attack the right of another, either on constitutional or other grounds, he must show an interest which is affected, or a right invaded. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

Water right attaches to land when finally adjudicated. —

A water right upon land, which is mentioned in the application and permit for appropriation, becomes attached to that land when it is finally adjudicated and cannot be subsequently severed from it or conveyed in derogation of the rights of the state. White v. Board of Land Comm'rs, 595 P.2d 76,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 415

(Wyo. 1979).

Injunction. —

In suit to quiet title to certain irrigation waters, wherein defendant alleged right to use of water as result of continuous irrigation for more than 25 years, evidence precluded issuance of injunction restraining defendant from the further use thereof. Lincoln Land Co. v. Davis, 27 F. Supp. 1006, 1939 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 2789 (D. Wyo. 1939).

Abatement as nuisance. —

Dam more than ten feet high may be abated as nuisance even though it is not in natural stream, but only as to the excess and reasonably without infliction of unnecessary injury. State v. Hiber, 48 Wyo. 172, 44 P.2d 1005,

1935 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 1935).

Prior adjudication. —

Petition to intervene brought by irrigators to adjudicate water rights was properly dismissed by the district court, pursuant to Rule 12(b)(6), W.R.C.P., as the matter was barred by res judicata and the petition was untimely. The disputed reservoir certificates were previously adjudicated in 1963. In re General Adjudication of All Rights to use Water in the Big Horn River System, 2004 WY 21, 85 P.3d 981,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 2004).

Stated

in

Wyoming v. United States, 933 F. Supp. 1030, 1996 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 11526 (D. Wyo. 1996).

Cited

in

Johnston v. Little Horse Creek Irrigating Co., 13 Wyo. 208, 79 P. 22,

1904 Wyo. LEXIS 39

, 70 L.R.A. 341 (1904); Hunt v. City of Laramie, 26 Wyo. 160, 181 P. 137,

1919 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(1919).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Rights of Wyoming Appropriators in Underground Water,” see 1 Wyo. L.J. 111.

For article, “Priority and Progress — Case Studies in the Transfer of Water Rights,” see I Land & Water L. Rev. 1 (1966).

For comment, “Water Appropriation for Recreation,” see I Land & Water L. Rev. 209 (1966).

For article, “Transfer of Water Rights — Errata and Addenda — Sales for Recreational Purposes and to Districts,” see II Land & Water L. Rev. 321 (1967).

For comment, “Improvement of Existing Water Rights Through Unification — A Case Study on the Consolidation of Appropriations,” see II Land & Water L. Rev. 327 (1967).

For article, “The Disparity Between State Water Rights Records and Actual Water Use Patterns,” see V Land & Water L. Rev. 23 (1970).

For article, “The Rise and Fall of Natural Resource Systems,” see VIII Land & Water L. Rev. 429 (1973).

For comment, “‘It's Our Water!’ — Can Wyoming Constitutionally Prohibit the Exportation of State Waters?” see X Land & Water L. Rev. 119 (1975).

For comment, “Forfeiture Proceedings in Wyoming Water Law: The Legislature Revives Private Standing,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 459 (1985).

For article, “Aldo Leopold and Western Water Law: Thinking Perpendicular to the Prior Appropriation Doctrine,” see XXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 1 (1989).

For case note, “Water Law — Quantification of Federal Reserve Indian Water Rights — ‘Practicably Irrigated Acreage’ Under Fire: The Search for a Better Legal Standard. In re General Adjudication of All Rights to Use Water in Big Horn River Sys., 753 P.2d 76,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1988), aff'd, 492 U.S. 406, 106 L. Ed. 2d 342, 109 S. Ct. 2994, 1989 U.S. LEXIS 3173 (1989), cert. denied, 492 U.S. 926, 109 S. Ct. 3265, 106 L. Ed. 2d 610, 1989 U.S. LEXIS 3337 (1989), overruled on other grounds, Vaughn v. State, 962 P.2d 149,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 1998),” see XXV Land & Water L. Rev. 417 (1990).

§ 41-4-502.
Application for permit to acquire right to beneficial use of public water; duty of state engineer upon receipt; use for irrigation purposes; defective applications; corrections; cancellation; extensions.

On receipt of an application for a permit to acquire the right to the beneficial use of the public water of the state of Wyoming, which application shall be on a form prescribed or designated by the state engineer, it is the state engineer’s duty to date the application and to make a record of receipt of the application in his office. It is the state engineer’s duty to examine all applications to ascertain that they contain all the necessary information to show the location, nature and amount of the proposed beneficial use. If the proposed beneficial use is for irrigation purposes, the application shall give the total acreage to be irrigated and the acreage in each legal subdivision of land proposed to be irrigated. If, upon such examination, an application submitted in hard copy is found defective, it is the duty of the state engineer to return the application for correction, with reasons therefor, and the time allowed within which to make such corrections, which shall not be less than ninety (90) days, shall be endorsed on the application, or by correspondence accompanying the return of the application, and a record made thereof. A like record shall be kept of the date of the return of corrected applications, and of the date of the refusal and return of applications rejected. If the application is submitted in hard copy, the defective application shall be returned by United States postal service or by other generally accepted mail delivery method to the post-office address given by the applicant. If the application is submitted electronically, the defective application shall be returned electronically. If, at the expiration of the time allowed within which to make such corrections, the application has not been returned to the office of the state engineer with the corrections properly made, it is the duty of the state engineer to cancel the filing covered by the application. The state engineer, if in his opinion an extension is justified, or, upon request by the applicant for good cause shown, shall grant extensions of time for making corrections. However, extensions will not be granted if the request for the extension is received after the expiration of the time period the applicant seeks to extend.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 8, § 34; 1895, ch. 45, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 918; C.S. 1910, § 728; Laws 1915, ch. 26, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 836; R.S. 1931, § 122-405; C.S. 1945, § 71-239; W.S. 1957, § 41-202; Laws 1969, ch. 147, § 1; 1980, ch. 67, § 1; 2005, ch. 15, § 2; 2021 ch. 26, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in the first sentence inserted “or designated” and deleted “in a suitable book” preceding “in his office”; rewrote the fourth sentence; and inserted the present sixth sentence.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, substituted "United States postal service or by other generally accepted mail delivery method to the post-office address given by the applicant" for "certified mail, requesting return receipt" at the end of the sixth sentence.

Appropriation cannot be made except by securing permit

in conformity with statute. Wyoming Hereford Ranch v. Hammond Packing Co., 33 Wyo. 14, 236 P. 764,

1925 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 1925).

Direct flow rights. —

When legislature first enacted this section in 1895, it was legislating for permits relative to direct flow of stream rights and not concerning storage and reservoir rights. Anderson v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 60 Wyo. 417, 154 P.2d 318,

1944 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1944).

Applied

in

Green River Dev. Co. v. FMC Corp., 660 P.2d 339,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 288

(Wyo. 1983).

Cited

in

Hamp v. State, 19 Wyo. 377, 118 P. 653,

1911 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(1911); Laughlin v. State Bd. of Control, 21 Wyo. 99, 128 P. 517,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(1912).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Record Title of Water and Ditch Rights,” see 6 Wyo. L.J. 200 (1957).

For comment, “‘It's Our Water!’ — Can Wyoming Constitutionally Prohibit the Exportation of State Waters?” see X Land & Water L. Rev. 119 (1975).

For article, “Industrial Siting Legislation: The Wyoming Industrial Development Information and Siting Act — Advance or Retreat?” see XI Land & Water L. Rev. 27 (1976).

For case note, “Water Law — The State Engineer's Authority with Reference to Change of Use, Place of Use, Point of Diversion, and Means of Conveyance of Water Embraced by Water Permits. Green River Dev. Co. v. FMC Corp., 660 P.2d 339,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 288

(Wyo. 1983),” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 59 (1984).

For comment, “Forfeiture Proceedings in Wyoming Water Law: The Legislature Revives Private Standing,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 459 (1985).

For case note, “Water Law — Quantification of Federal Reserve Indian Water Rights — ‘Practicably Irrigated Acreage’ Under Fire: The Search for a Better Legal Standard. In re General Adjudication of All Rights to Use Water in Big Horn River Sys., 753 P.2d 76,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1988), aff'd, 492 U.S. 406, 106 L. Ed. 2d 342, 109 S. Ct. 2994, 1989 U.S. LEXIS 3173 (1989), cert. denied, 492 U.S. 926, 109 S. Ct. 3265, 106 L. Ed. 2d 610, 1989 U.S. LEXIS 3337 (1989), overruled on other grounds, Vaughn v. State, 962 P.2d 149,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 1998), aff'd mem. sub nom. Wyoming v. United States, 492 U.S. 406, 106 L. Ed. 2d 342, 109 S. Ct. 2994, 1989 U.S. LEXIS 3173 (1989),” see XXV Land & Water L. Rev. 417 (1990).

§ 41-4-503.
Recordation; approval or rejection generally.

All applications which shall comply with the provisions of this chapter, and with the regulations of the engineer’s office, shall be recorded in a suitable book kept for that purpose; and it shall be the duty of the state engineer to approve all applications made in proper form, which contemplate the application of the water to a beneficial use and where the proposed use does not tend to impair the value of existing rights, or be otherwise detrimental to the public welfare. But where there is no unappropriated water in the proposed source of supply, or where the proposed use conflicts with existing rights, or threatens to prove detrimental to the public interest, it shall be the duty of the state engineer to reject such application and refuse to issue the permit asked for.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 8, § 34; 1895, ch. 45, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 919; C.S. 1910, § 729; C.S. 1920, § 837; R.S. 1931, § 122-406; C.S. 1945, § 71-240; W.S. 1957, § 41-203.

Appropriation of water seeping from canal. —

Application for appropriation of waters seeping on to a farmer's land from a water association canal by means of drains erected by the farmer may be denied if the drain ditch tends to deplete waters being transported in the canal, but if the drain ditch gathers seepage which is uncaptured by the canal owner and which would naturally reach a stream, the water is appropriable as being a part of the stream to which it flows. Bower v. Big Horn Canal Ass'n, 77 Wyo. 80, 307 P.2d 593,

1957 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(Wyo. 1957).

A permit was properly granted to plaintiff for the appropriation of waters seeping from defendant water association's canal onto plaintiff's land; but any rights plaintiff secured thereby were subject, of course, to the right of defendant to terminate that source of the supply, which seeped directly from defendant's canal, and subject also to the rights of prior appropriators further down the stream, if they could prove that interception of the water materially damaged their prior rights. Plaintiff's right was, however, superior to any claims of subsequent appropriators. Bower v. Big Horn Canal Ass'n, 77 Wyo. 80, 307 P.2d 593,

1957 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(Wyo. 1957).

Speculation is issue

during an application proceeding, pursuant to this section, and during the final stages leading to a certificate of appropriation, pursuant to §

41-4-511

, and it may also be an issue during an abandonment proceeding, pursuant to §

41-3-401

.Denius v. T R Twelve, Inc., 589 P.2d 374,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 345

(Wyo. 1979).

Claimed water rights not relitigated. —

Holders of vested senior water rights cannot, in a proceeding contemplated by the extension-of-time statute (§

41-4-506

), litigate claimed rights conceived by the original reservoir permit approval-or-rejection statute (this section). Associated Enters. v. Toltec Watershed Improvement Dist., 578 P.2d 1359,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 293

(Wyo. 1978).

Petition to intervene brought by irrigators to adjudicate water rights was properly dismissed by the district court, pursuant to Rule 12(b)(6), W.R.C.P., as the matter was barred by res judicata and the petition was untimely. The disputed reservoir certificates were previously adjudicated in 1963. In re General Adjudication of All Rights to use Water in the Big Horn River System, 2004 WY 21, 85 P.3d 981,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 2004).

Applied

in

Green River Dev. Co. v. FMC Corp., 660 P.2d 339,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 288

(Wyo. 1983).

Stated

in

Wyoming v. United States, 933 F. Supp. 1030, 1996 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 11526 (D. Wyo. 1996).

Cited

in

Whalon v. North Platte Canal & Colonization Co., 11 Wyo. 313, 71 P. 995,

1903 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(1903); Laughlin v. State Bd. of Control, 21 Wyo. 99, 128 P. 517,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(1912); Wyoming Hereford Ranch v. Hammond Packing Co., 33 Wyo. 14, 236 P. 764,

1925 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(1925).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “‘It's Our Water!’ — Can Wyoming Constitutionally Prohibit the Exportation of State Waters?” see X Land & Water L. Rev. 119 (1975).

For comment, “The Idaho and Montana Procedures for Obtaining Water Use Permits — Possible Sources for Improvement of Wyoming Law,” see X Land & Water L. Rev. 435 (1975).

For article, “Industrial Siting Legislation: The Wyoming Industrial Development Information and Siting Act — Advance or Retreat?” see XI Land & Water L. Rev. 27 (1976).

For comment, “Sporhase v. Nebraska ex rel. Douglas: State Control of Water Under the Constraints of the Commerce Clause,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 513 (1983).

For comment, “Forfeiture Proceedings in Wyoming Water Law: The Legislature Revives Private Standing,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 459 (1985).

§ 41-4-504.
Endorsement by state engineer; return to applicant; effect of approval or rejection.

The refusal or approval of an application shall be endorsed thereon and a record made of such endorsement in the state engineer’s office. The application so endorsed shall be returned to the applicant. If approved, the applicant shall be authorized, on receipt thereof, to proceed with the construction of the necessary works, and to take all steps required to apply the water to a beneficial use, and to perfect the proposed appropriation. If the application is refused, the applicant shall take no steps toward the prosecution of the proposed work, or the diversion and use of the public water so long as such refusal shall continue in force. Any violation of this section, unless exempt under W.S.

41-3-301

, shall be punishable pursuant to W.S. 41-3-616(a).

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 8, § 34; 1895, ch. 45, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 920; C.S. 1910, § 730; C.S. 1920, § 838; R.S. 1931, § 122-407; C.S. 1945, § 71-241; W.S. 1957, § 41-204; Laws 2005, ch. 82, § 2.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, added the last sentence.

Prior adjudication. —

Petition to intervene brought by irrigators to adjudicate water rights was properly dismissed by the district court, pursuant to Rule 12(b)(6), W.R.C.P., as the matter was barred by res judicata and the petition was untimely. The disputed reservoir certificates were previously adjudicated in 1963. In re General Adjudication of All Rights to use Water in the Big Horn River System, 2004 WY 21, 85 P.3d 981,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 2004).

Right to appeal. —

Applicant's right to appeal, given under §

41-4-517

, does not mature upon the engineer's return of the application for additional information. Laughlin v. State Bd. of Control, 21 Wyo. 99, 128 P. 517,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1912).

Applied

in

Green River Dev. Co. v. FMC Corp., 660 P.2d 339,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 288

(Wyo. 1983).

Cited

in

Whalon v. North Platte Canal & Colonization Co., 11 Wyo. 313, 71 P. 995,

1903 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(1903); Hamp v. State, 19 Wyo. 377, 118 P. 653,

1911 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(1911); Wyoming Hereford Ranch v. Hammond Packing Co., 33 Wyo. 14, 236 P. 764,

1925 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(1925).

§ 41-4-505.
Additional information before approval or rejection.

Before either approving or rejecting an application, the state engineer may require such additional information as will enable him to properly guard the public interests, and may, in the case of applications proposing to divert more than twenty-five (25) cubic feet of water per second of time, or to reclaim over one thousand (1,000) acres of land, require a statement of the following facts:

In case of incorporated companies, he may require the submission of the articles of incorporation, the names and places of residence of its directors and officers, and the amount of its authorized and of its paid up capital;

If the applicant is not an incorporated company, he may require a showing as to the name or names of the party or parties proposing to construct the work, and a showing of facts necessary to enable him to determine whether or not they have the financial ability to carry out the proposed work, and whether or not the said application has been made in good faith.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 8, § 34; 1895, ch. 45, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 921; C.S. 1910, § 731; C.S. 1920, § 839; R.S. 1931, § 122-408; C.S. 1945, § 71-242; W.S. 1957, § 41-205.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Cited

in

Whalon v. North Platte Canal & Colonization Co., 11 Wyo. 313, 71 P. 995,

1903 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(1903); Laughlin v. State Bd. of Control, 21 Wyo. 99, 128 P. 517,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(1912); Wyoming Hereford Ranch v. Hammond Packing Co., 33 Wyo. 14, 236 P. 764,

1925 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(1925).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Industrial Siting Legislation: The Wyoming Industrial Development Information and Siting Act — Advance or Retreat?” see XI Land & Water L. Rev. 27 (1976).

For comment, “Forfeiture Proceedings in Wyoming Water Law: The Legislature Revives Private Standing,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 459 (1985).